North Carolina, session 2025, SB1001.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

MODIFY COASTAL AREA MANAGEMENT ACT APPLICATION PROCESSING
RULE TO CLARIFY ADJACENT LANDOWNER NOTICE REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 1.(a) Definitions. – For purposes of this section and its implementation,
"CAMA Application Processing Rule" means 15A NCAC 07J .0204 (Processing the
Application).
SECTION 1.(b) CAMA Application Processing Rule. – Until the effective date of
the revised permanent rule that the Coastal Resources Commission (Commission) is required to
adopt pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, the Commission shall implement the CAMA
Application Processing Rule as provided in subsection (c) of this section.
SECTION 1.(c) Implementation. – For both CAMA major and minor development
permit applications, the CAMA Application Processing Rule shall provide the following:
(1) Documentation showing that notice was sent by certified mail to an adjacent
riparian landowner at the tax address of record satisfies the notice
requirements of the CAMA Application Processing Rule if the applicant
provides proof that the adjacent riparian landowner received the notice.
(2) If the applicant cannot provide proof that the adjacent riparian landowner
received the notice, the permit application may proceed without proof of
receipt only if the applicant provides documentation showing that notice was
sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, at least 60 days before issuance
of the permit, to both (i) the adjacent riparian landowner's tax address of
record and (ii) the property address of the adjacent riparian property, if a
separate property address has been assigned and differs from the landowner's
tax address of record.
(3) During the 60-day period following the date the notice was sent by certified
mail, the Department of Environmental Quality, the Division of Coastal
*S1001-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Management, or the local permit officer may continue to process the
application. If there is no proof of receipt, however, the permit shall not be
issued until the 60-day period has expired. The failure of an adjacent riparian
landowner to receive, claim, or respond to the certified mail notice shall not
delay or prevent issuance of the permit after the 60-day period has expired.
(4) Nothing in this subsection is intended to limit or prohibit an applicant for a
minor development permit from using any other method of notice permitted
by applicable law or rule.
SECTION 1.(d) Additional Rulemaking Authority. – The Commission shall adopt
a rule to amend the CAMA Application Processing Rule consistent with subsection (c) of this
section. Notwithstanding G.S. 150B-19(4), the rule adopted by the Commission pursuant to this
section shall be substantively identical to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this section are not subject to Part 3 of Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the
General Statutes. Rules adopted pursuant to this section shall become effective as provided in
G.S. 150B-21.3(b1), as though 10 or more written objections had been received as provided in
G.S. 150B-21.3(b2).
SECTION 1.(e) Sunset. – This section expires when permanent rules adopted as
required by subsection (d) of this section become effective.

RESERVED
SECTION 2. Reserved.

AMEND UPLAND BASIN DISSOLVED OXYGEN REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 113A-129.11 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(2a) Project baseline area. – An area defined as 50 feet plus or minus 5 feet from
the location of the proposed entrance to the proposed upland basin marina."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 113A-129.12(b)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) The waters contained in the upland basin marina have a dissolved oxygen
content equal to or greater than the dissolved oxygen content of the water
located 50 feet plus or minus 5 feet from the entrance to the upland basin
marina before development. within the project baseline area prior to the
development, as provided in this subdivision:
a. As part of the application, an applicant shall provide to the Division of
Water Resources and the Division of Coastal Management
site-specific sampling data documenting pre-project dissolved oxygen
levels of the water located 50 feet plus or minus 5 feet from each
proposed entrance to the proposed upland basin marina. in the project
baseline area. Waters located within the upland basin marina shall be
classified the same as the waters in the immediate vicinity of any
entrance to the upland basin marina.
b. If the site-specific sampling data documents pre-project ambient
dissolved oxygen levels above 5.0 mg/L in the project baseline area,
the applicant may demonstrate compliance with dissolved oxygen
standards through site-specific modeling certified by a North Carolina
licensed professional engineer that the marina design provides
sufficient flushing to maintain dissolved oxygen levels equal to the
greater of (i) the pre-project ambient levels or (ii) the level sufficient
to support aquatic habitat. A demonstration under this sub-subdivision
is only for pre-permitting design demonstration purposes and shall be
used only to determine whether aeration or other active interventions
are required as a condition of permit issuance.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1001-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. If the applicant provides a demonstration under sub-subdivision b. of
this subdivision, the Department shall not require additional
mechanical aeration or other active interventions intended to increase
or maintain dissolved oxygen as a condition of permit issuance unless
the Department provides written findings to the applicant within 90
days of the receipt of the demonstration that identify one or more
specific deficiencies in the demonstration. For purposes of this
sub-subdivision, a specific deficiency may include a deficiency in the
methodology, assumptions, data representativeness, model
calibration, consistency with applicable water quality standards, or
site-specific monitoring data relied upon in the demonstration.
d. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to modify, supersede, or
invalidate any certification issued under section 401 of the federal
Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1341, any federal permit, any permit
issued under the Coastal Area Management Act, or any condition of
those approvals. The Department's acceptance of a demonstration
under sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision shall not limit or
supersede the Department's continuing authority to require
monitoring, adaptive management, mechanical aeration, or other
corrective measures as necessary to maintain compliance with
applicable water quality standards or with the conditions of any
applicable permit or certification."

AMEND UPLAND BASIN FINANCIAL ASSURANCE REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 4. G.S. 113A-129.12(b)(3) reads as rewritten:
"(3) The project has a bond or set-aside funds for the long-term operation and
maintenance of any technology required to meet or exceed then-applicable
water quality standards. The applicant shall provide an estimate of annual
operation and maintenance costs, and the bond or set-aside funds shall be
equal to five years of the estimated annual operation and maintenance costs.
If the requirements of this subdivision are met by a bond, the bond shall
identify as the beneficiary of the State or the appropriate permitting agency.
If the requirements of this subdivision are met by set-aside funds, the applicant
shall establish a trust at a bank, savings and loan institution, credit union,
brokerage firm, or company registered under the Investment Company Act of
1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1, et seq., and designate the State or the appropriate
permitting agency as the beneficiary. The Department may specify the form
in which the bond or set-aside funds are provided, as well as a procedure for
transfer of the financial assurance if ownership of the upland basin marina
changes."

UPLAND BASIN TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS
SECTION 5.(a) G.S. 113A-129.12(b)(1) reads as rewritten:
"(1) The upland basin marina is designed to accommodate 10 or more more than
10 vessels, including individual homeowner boat slips, boat lifts, or dry stack
storage."
SECTION 5.(b) G.S. 113A-129.12(e)(3) reads as rewritten:
"(3) The policy goals stated in G.S. 113-102(b).G.S. 113A-102(b)."

COASTAL STORM DAMAGE MITIGATION FUND ELIGIBLE EXPENSE REVISION
SECTION 6.(a) G.S. 143-215.73M reads as rewritten:
Senate Bill 1001-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 143-215.73M. Coastal Storm Damage Mitigation Fund.
(a) Fund Established. – The Coastal Storm Damage Mitigation Fund is established as a
special revenue fund. The Fund consists of General Fund appropriations, gifts, grants, devises,
monies contributed by a non-State entity for a particular beach nourishment or damage mitigation
project or group of projects, and any other revenues specifically allocated to the Fund by an act
of the General Assembly.
(b) Uses of the Fund. – Revenue credited to the Fund may only be used for costs any of
the following:
(1) Costs associated with beach nourishment, artificial dunes, and other projects
to mitigate or remediate coastal storm damage to the ocean beaches and dune
systems of the State.
(2) Costs associated with the permitting, construction, or repair of a terminal groin
permitted under G.S. 113A-115.1, provided that all of the following
requirements are met:
a. The project is sponsored by a unit of local government.
b. The Secretary determines that the project would provide storm damage
mitigation or resiliency benefits to public lands in the vicinity of the
terminal groin.
For purposes of this subdivision, construction or repair costs do not include
the costs of financial assurance or costs of implementation of any component
of the applicable inlet management plan.
…."
SECTION 6.(b) There is appropriated the sum of eight hundred thousand dollars
($800,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year from the General Fund to the
Department of Environmental Quality for the Coastal Storm Damage Mitigation Fund,
established by G.S. 143-215.73M, to be used for purposes consistent with that statute.

COASTAL RESERVE AGENCY AUTHORITY
SECTION 6.5.(a) G.S. 113A-129.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 113A-129.2. Coastal Reserve Program.
(a) There is hereby created a North Carolina Coastal Reserve System for the purpose of
acquiring, improving, and maintaining undeveloped coastal land and water areas in a natural
state.
(b) This system shall be established and administered by the Department of
Environmental Quality. In so doing the Department shall consult with and seek the ongoing
advice of Quality, subject to (i) use standards adopted for the system by the Coastal Resources
Commission and (ii) permits and orders issued by the Coastal Resources Commission.
Commission concerning activities allowed in the system. The Department may by rule define the
areas to be included in this system and set standards for its use.
(c) This system shall be established within the coastal area as defined by
G.S. 113A-103(2).
(d) All acquisitions or dispositions of property for lands within this system shall be in
accordance with the provisions of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes.
(e) All lands and waters within the system shall be used primarily for research and
education. Other public uses, such as hunting, fishing, navigation, and recreation, shall be
allowed to the extent consistent with these primary uses. Improvements and alterations to the
lands shall be limited to those consistent with these uses.
(f) With respect to any component of the system that is also a dedicated nature preserve
pursuant to Part 42 of Article 2 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes, the Department and the
Commission, in accordance with the authority granted to each pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section, shall act as primary custodian to manage such components, in accordance with the
Page 4 Senate Bill 1001-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
articles of dedication. The Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources shall monitor these
preserves and shall retain authority to report alleged violations of the approved management plan
or the articles of dedication for such preserves, in which case the Secretary shall request the
Department of Administration to coordinate mediation with the primary custodian. If mediation
is unsuccessful in resolving the issue, the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall
have standing and a right of action in the Superior Court of Wake County, or the county in which
the component is located, to enforce the terms of any articles of dedication applicable to such
components."
SECTION 6.5.(b) This section becomes effective January 1, 2027.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 7. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 1001-Second Edition Page 5